Colorado, session 2026A, HB1102.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-1-211, amend as it
exists until July 1, 2027, (2)(a) as follows:
42-1-211. Driver's license, record, identification, and vehicle
enterprise solution - DRIVES vehicle services account - Colorado
DRIVES county governance committee - definition - repeal.
(2) (a) The Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account is created
in the highway users tax fund for the purpose of providing funds for the
development and operation of Colorado DRIVES, including operations
performed under articles 2, 3, 4, 6, 7, and 12 of this title 42, to cover the
costs of administration and enforcement of the motorist insurance
identification database program created in section 42-7-604, and to
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

purchase and issue license plates, decals, and validating tabs in accordance
with article 3 of this title 42. THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT money
received from the fees imposed by sections 38-29-138 (1), (2), (4), and (5),
42-1-206 (2)(a), 42-1-210 (1)(a)(II), 42-1-231, 42-1-233 (3)(b), 42-2-107
(1)(a)(I), 42-2-114 (2)(b), (2)(c)(I), (2)(c)(II), (2)(e), and (4)(a), 42-2-114.5
(1), 42-2-117 (1), 42-2-118 (1)(b)(I)(C) and (1.5)(b), 42-2-133 (2),
42-2-306 (2), 42-2-406 (1), (2), (3)(d), and (6), 42-2-508 (1), 42-3-107 (22),
42-3-211 (7), 42-3-213 (1)(b)(IV), 42-3-304 (18)(d)(I)(B), 42-3-306 (14),
42-3-312, 42-3-313 (2)(c)(I), 42-6-110 (1.7)(c), 42-6-137 (1), (2), (4), (5),
and (6), and 42-6-138 (1)(a), (2), and (4) and any money received through
gifts, grants, and donations to the account from private or public sources for
the purposes of this section shall be credited by the state treasurer to the
Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account. The general assembly shall
appropriate annually the money in the account for the purposes of this
subsection (2). If any unexpended and unencumbered money remains in the
account at the end of a fiscal year, the balance remains in the account and
is not transferred to the general fund or any other fund.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-1-211, amend as it
will become effective July 1, 2027, (2)(a) as follows:
42-1-211. Driver's license, record, identification, and vehicle
enterprise solution - DRIVES vehicle services account - Colorado
DRIVES county governance committee - definition - repeal.
(2) (a) The Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account is created
in the highway users tax fund for the purpose of providing funds for the
development and operation of Colorado DRIVES, including operations
performed under articles 2, 3, 4, 6, 7, and 12 of this title 42, to cover the
costs of administration and enforcement of the motorist insurance
identification database program created in section 42-7-604, and to
purchase and issue license plates, decals, and validating tabs in accordance
with article 3 of this title 42. THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT money
received from the fees imposed by sections 38-29-138 (1), (2), (4), and (5),
42-1-206 (2)(a), 42-1-210 (1)(a)(II), 42-1-231, 42-1-233 (3)(b), 42-2-107
(1)(a)(I), 42-2-114 (2)(b), (2)(c)(I), (2)(c)(II), (2)(e), and (4)(a), 42-2-114.5
(1), 42-2-117 (1), 42-2-118 (1)(b)(I)(C) and (1.5)(b), 42-2-133 (2),
42-2-306 (2), 42-2-406 (1), (2), (3)(d), and (6), 42-2-508 (1), 42-3-107 (22),
42-3-112 (2), 42-3-211 (7), 42-3-213 (1)(b)(IV), 42-3-304 (18)(d)(I)(B),
42-3-306 (14), 42-3-312, 42-3-313 (2)(c)(I), 42-3-315, 42-6-110 (1.7)(c),
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1102

42-6-137 (1), (2), (4), (5), and (6), and 42-6-138 (1)(a), (2), and (4) and any
money received through gifts, grants, and donations to the account from
private or public sources for the purposes of this section shall be credited
by the state treasurer to the Colorado DRIVES vehicle services account.
The general assembly shall appropriate annually the money in the account
for the purposes of this subsection (2). If any unexpended and
unencumbered money remains in the account at the end of a fiscal year, the
balance remains in the account and is not transferred to the general fund or
any other fund.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-3-112, amend (2)
as follows:
42-3-112. Failure to pay tax - penalty - rules - repeal.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT OR THE AUTHORIZED AGENT THAT REGISTERS
THE MOTOR VEHICLE SHALL RETAIN ten dollars of the late registration fee.
shall be retained by the department or the authorized agent who registers the
motor vehicle Each authorized agent shall remit to the department no less
frequently than once a month, but otherwise at the time and in the manner
required by the executive director of the department, the remainder of the
late registration fees collected by the authorized agent. The executive
director shall forward all late registration fees remitted by authorized agents
plus the remainder of the late registration fees collected directly by the
department to the state treasurer, who shall credit THE LATE REGISTRATION
FEES AS FOLLOWS:
(a) (I) The FOR LATE REGISTRATION FEES FORWARDED ON OR BEFORE
JUNE 30, 2027, ALL fees to the highway users tax fund in accordance with
section 43-4-804 (1)(e). C.R.S.
(II) THIS SUBSECTION (2)(a) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2028.
(b) FOR LATE REGISTRATION FEES FORWARDED ON AND AFTER JULY
1, 2027, TWO DOLLARS OF EACH LATE REGISTRATION FEE TO THE COLORADO
DRIVES VEHICLE SERVICES ACCOUNT CREATED IN SECTION 42-1-211 (2) IN
THE HIGHWAY USERS TAX FUND AND THE REMAINDER OF THE FEES TO THE
HIGHWAY USERS TAX FUND IN ACCORDANCE WITH SECTION 43-4-804 (1)(e).
SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 42-3-211, amend (7)
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1102

as follows:
42-3-211. Issuance of personalized plates authorized.
(7) (a) All applications for special registration of motor vehicles
shall MUST be made directly to the department, and THE DEPARTMENT shall
be administered by ADMINISTER the department SPECIAL REGISTRATIONS.
(b) (I) (A) All fees received ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2026, from
special registrations shall be ARE credited to the highway users tax fund
created in section 43-4-201 C.R.S., and allocated and expended as specified
in section 43-4-205 (5.5)(b); C.R.S. except that two dollars of each such
special registration fee collected pursuant to paragraphs (a) to (d) of
subsection (6) SUBSECTIONS (6)(a) TO (6)(c) of this section shall be IS
remitted to the county general fund.
(B) THIS SUBSECTION (7)(b)(I) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE JULY 1,
2027.
(II) ON AND AFTER JULY 1, 2026, ALL FEES RECEIVED FROM SPECIAL
REGISTRATIONS ARE CREDITED TO THE COLORADO DRIVES VEHICLE
SERVICES ACCOUNT CREATED IN SECTION 42-1-211 (2) IN THE HIGHWAY
USERS TAX FUND; EXCEPT THAT TWO DOLLARS OF EACH SPECIAL
REGISTRATION FEE COLLECTED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTIONS (6)(a) TO (6)(c)
OF THIS SECTION IS REMITTED TO THE COUNTY GENERAL FUND.
SECTION 5. Effective date. This act takes effect only if section
39-27-102, Colorado Revised Statutes, as amended in section 21 of House
Bill 26-1289, becomes law, in which case section 2 of this act takes effect
July 1, 2027, and the remainder of this act takes effect upon passage or on
the effective date of House Bill 26-1289, whichever is later.
SECTION 6. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1102

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1102